Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2422
Informal appointment proceedings; registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a requested informal appointment of a personal representative should be made because of failure to meet the requirements of sections 30-2420 and 30-2421, or for any other reason, he may decline the application. A declination of informal appointment is not an adjudication and does not preclude appointment in formal proceedings.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 100, UPC § 3-309.